Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
§ 22.1-253.13:4.
Standard 4. Student achievement and graduation requirements.

Each local school board shall award diplomas to all secondary school students, including students who transfer from nonpublic schools or from home instruction, who meet the requirements prescribed by the Board and meet such other requirements as may be prescribed by the local school board and approved by the Board. Provisions shall be made to facilitate the transfer and appropriate grade placement of students from other public secondary schools, from nonpublic schools, or from home instruction as outlined in the standards for accreditation. The standards for accreditation shall include provisions relating to the completion of graduation requirements through Virtual Virginia. Further, reasonable accommodation to meet the requirements for diplomas shall be provided for otherwise qualified students with disabilities as needed.

In addition, each local school board may devise, vis-a-vis the award of diplomas to secondary school students, a mechanism for calculating class rankings that takes into consideration whether the student has taken a required class more than one time and has had any prior earned grade for such required class expunged.

Each local school board shall notify the parents of rising eleventh and twelfth grade students of (i) the requirements for graduation pursuant to the standards for accreditation and (ii) the requirements that have yet to be completed by the individual student.

Students identified as disabled who complete the requirements of their individualized education programs and meet certain requirements prescribed by the Board pursuant to regulations but do not meet the requirements for any named diploma shall be awarded Applied Studies diplomas by local school boards. The Board shall develop and implement statewide requirements for earning an Applied Studies diploma for implementation at the beginning of the 2022-2023 school year.

Each local school board shall notify the parent of such students with disabilities who have an individualized education program and who fail to meet the graduation requirements of the student’s right to a free and appropriate education to age 21, inclusive, pursuant to Article 2 (§ 22.1-213 et seq.) of Chapter 13.

The Department shall develop guidance, in multiple languages, for students and parents conveying (i) the limitations of the applied studies diploma, (ii) key curriculum and testing decisions that reduce the likelihood that a student will be able to obtain a standard diploma, and (iii) a statement that the pursuit of an applied studies diploma may preclude a student’s ability to pursue a standard diploma.

Each local school board shall provide guidance from the Department to parents of students with disabilities regarding the Applied Studies diploma and its limitations at a student’s annual individualized education program meeting corresponding to grades three through 12 when curriculum or statewide assessment decisions are being made that impact the type of diploma for which the student can qualify.

Students who have completed a prescribed course of study as defined by the local school board shall be awarded certificates of program completion by local school boards if they are not eligible to receive a Board-approved diploma.

Each local school board shall provide notification of the right to a free public education for students who have not reached 20 years of age on or before August 1 of the school year, pursuant to Chapter 1 (§ 22.1-1 et seq.), to the parent of students who fail to graduate or who have failed to achieve graduation requirements as provided in the standards for accreditation. If such student who does not graduate or complete such requirements is a student for whom English is a second language, the local school board shall notify the parent of the student’s opportunity for a free public education in accordance with § 22.1-5.

In establishing graduation requirements, the Board shall:

Develop and implement, in consultation with stakeholders representing elementary and secondary education, higher education, and business and industry in the Commonwealth and including parents, policymakers, and community leaders in the Commonwealth, a Profile of a Virginia Graduate that identifies the knowledge and skills that students should attain during high school in order to be successful contributors to the economy of the Commonwealth, giving due consideration to critical thinking, creative thinking, collaboration, communication, and citizenship.

Emphasize the development of core skill sets in the early years of high school.

Establish multiple paths toward college and career readiness for students to follow in the later years of high school. Each such pathway shall include opportunities for internships, externships, and credentialing.

Provide for the selection of integrated learning courses meeting the Standards of Learning and approved by the Board to satisfy graduation requirements, which shall include Standards of Learning testing, as necessary.

Require students to complete at least one course in fine or performing arts or career and technical education, one course in United States and Virginia history, and two sequential elective courses chosen from a concentration of courses selected from a variety of options that may be planned to ensure the completion of a focused sequence of elective courses that provides a foundation for further education or training or preparation for employment.

Require that students (i) complete an Advanced Placement, honors, International Baccalaureate, or dual enrollment course; (ii) complete a high-quality work-based learning experience, as defined by the Board; or (iii) earn a career and technical education credential that has been approved by the Board, except when a career and technical education credential in a particular subject area is not readily available or appropriate or does not adequately measure student competency, in which case the student shall receive satisfactory competency-based instruction in the subject area to earn credit. The career and technical education credential, when required, could include the successful completion of an industry certification, a state licensure examination, a national occupational competency assessment, the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery, or the Virginia workplace readiness skills assessment. The Department shall develop, maintain, and make available to each local school board a catalogue of the testing accommodations available to English language learners for each such certification, examination, assessment, and battery. Each local school board shall develop and implement policies to require each high school principal or his designee to notify each English language learner of the availability of such testing accommodations prior to the student’s participation in any such certification, examination, assessment, or battery.

Require students to be trained in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of automated external defibrillators, including hands-on practice of the skills necessary to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

Make provision in its regulations for students with disabilities to earn a diploma.

Require students to complete one virtual course, which may be a noncredit-bearing course.

Provide that students who complete elective classes into which the Standards of Learning for any required course have been integrated and achieve a passing score on the relevant Standards of Learning test for the relevant required course receive credit for such elective class.

Establish a procedure to facilitate the acceleration of students that allows qualified students, with the recommendation of the division superintendent, without completing the 140-hour class, to obtain credit for such class upon demonstrating mastery of the course content and objectives and receiving a passing score on the relevant Standards of Learning assessment. Nothing in this section shall preclude relevant school division personnel from enforcing compulsory attendance in public schools.

Provide for the award of credit for passing scores on industry certifications, state licensure examinations, and national occupational competency assessments approved by the Board.

School boards shall report annually to the Board the number of Board-approved industry certifications obtained, state licensure examinations passed, national occupational competency assessments passed, Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery assessments passed, and Virginia workplace readiness skills assessments passed, and the number of career and technical education completers who graduated. These numbers shall be reported as separate categories on the School Performance Report Card.

For the purposes of this subdivision, “career and technical education completer” means a student who has met the requirements for a career and technical concentration or specialization and all requirements for high school graduation or an approved alternative education program.

In addition, the Board may:

For the purpose of awarding credit, approve the use of additional or substitute tests for the correlated Standards of Learning assessment, such as academic achievement tests, industry certifications, or state licensure examinations; and

Permit students completing career and technical education programs designed to enable such students to pass such industry certification examinations or state licensure examinations to be awarded, upon obtaining satisfactory scores on such industry certification or licensure examinations, appropriate credit for one or more career and technical education classes into which relevant Standards of Learning for various classes taught at the same level have been integrated. Such industry certification and state licensure examinations may cover relevant Standards of Learning for various required classes and may, at the discretion of the Board, address some Standards of Learning for several required classes.

In the exercise of its authority to recognize exemplary performance by providing for diploma seals:

The Board shall develop criteria for recognizing exemplary performance in career and technical education programs by students who have completed the requirements for a Board of Education-approved diploma and shall award seals on the diplomas of students meeting such criteria.

The Board shall establish criteria for awarding a diploma seal for science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) for the Board-approved diplomas. The Board shall consider including criteria for (i) relevant coursework; (ii) technical writing, reading, and oral communication skills; (iii) relevant training; and (iv) industry, professional, and trade association national certifications.

The Board shall establish criteria for awarding a diploma seal for excellence in civics education and understanding of our state and federal constitutions and the democratic model of government for the Board-approved diplomas. The Board shall consider including criteria for (i) successful completion of history, government, and civics courses, including courses that incorporate character education; (ii) voluntary participation in community service or extracurricular activities that includes the types of activities that shall qualify as community service and the number of hours required; and (iii) related requirements as it deems appropriate.

The Board shall establish criteria for awarding a diploma seal of biliteracy to any student who demonstrates proficiency in English and at least one other language for the Board-approved diplomas. The Board shall consider criteria including the student’s (i) score on a College Board Advanced Placement foreign language examination, (ii) score on an SAT II Subject Test in a foreign language, (iii) proficiency level on an ACTFL Assessment of Performance toward Proficiency in Languages (AAPPL) measure or another nationally or internationally recognized language proficiency test, or (iv) cumulative grade point average in a sequence of foreign language courses approved by the Board.

The Board shall establish, by regulation, requirements for the award of a general achievement adult high school diploma for those persons who are not subject to the compulsory school attendance requirements of § 22.1-254 and have (i) achieved a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board; (ii) successfully completed an education and training program designated by the Board; (iii) earned a Board-approved career and technical education credential such as the successful completion of an industry certification, a state licensure examination, a national occupational competency assessment, the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery, or the Virginia workplace readiness skills assessment; and (iv) satisfied other requirements as may be established by the Board for the award of such diploma.

To ensure the uniform assessment of high school graduation rates, the Board shall collect, analyze, report, and make available to the public high school graduation and dropout data using a formula prescribed by the Board.

The Board shall also collect, analyze, report, and make available to the public high school graduation and dropout data using a formula that excludes any student who fails to graduate because such student is in the custody of the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or local law enforcement. For the purposes of the Standards of Accreditation, the Board shall use the graduation rate required by this subsection.

The Board may promulgate such regulations as may be necessary and appropriate for the collection, analysis, and reporting of such data required by subsections G and H.

13.

Provide for the waiver of certain graduation requirements (i) upon the Board’s initiative or (ii) at the request of a local school board. Such waivers shall be granted only for good cause and shall be considered on a case-by-case basis.

14.

Consider all computer science course credits earned by students to be science course credits, mathematics course credits, or career and technical education credits. The Board shall develop guidelines addressing how computer science courses can satisfy graduation requirements.

15.

Permit local school divisions to waive the requirement for students to receive 140 clock hours of instruction upon providing the Board with satisfactory proof, based on Board guidelines, that the students for whom such requirements are waived have learned the content and skills included in the relevant Standards of Learning.

16.

Provide for the award of verified units of credit for a satisfactory score, as determined by the Board, on the Preliminary ACT (PreACT) or Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT) examination.

17.

Permit students to exceed a full course load in order to participate in courses offered by an institution of higher education that lead to a degree, certificate, or credential at such institution.

18.

Permit local school divisions to waive the requirement for students to receive 140 clock hours of instruction after the student has completed the course curriculum and relevant Standards of Learning end-of-course assessment, or Board-approved substitute, provided that such student subsequently receives instruction, coursework, or study toward an industry certification approved by the local school board.

19.

Permit any English language learner who previously earned a sufficient score on an Advanced Placement or International Baccalaureate foreign language examination or an SAT II Subject Test in a foreign language to substitute computer coding course credit for any foreign language course credit required to graduate, except in cases in which such foreign language course credit is required to earn an advanced diploma offered by a nationally recognized provider of college-level courses.

20.

Permit a student who is pursuing an advanced diploma and whose individualized education program specifies a credit accommodation for world language to substitute two standard units of credit in computer science for two standard units of credit in a world language. For any student that elects to substitute a credit in computer science for credit in world language, his or her school counselor must provide notice to the student and parent or guardian of possible impacts related to college entrance requirements.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 1993, c. 661; 1994, cc. 618, 790; 1997, cc. 828, 835; 1998, cc. 72, 602, 627; 2001, cc. 483, 500; 2003, c. 688; 2004, cc. 509, 939, 955; 2005, c. 345; 2006, c. 584; 2007, cc. 34, 56, 234, 351, 859, 919; 2008, c. 351; 2009, c. 490; 2010, cc. 80, 89, 162, 163, 313; 2011, c. 209; 2012, cc. 454, 642; 2013, cc. 498, 530; 2014, cc. 84, 590; 2015, cc. 329, 564, 565, 591, 701, 702, 705; 2016, cc. 720, 750; 2017, cc. 330, 685; 2018, cc. 139, 482, 512, 592, 716; 2020, cc. 55, 580, 874; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451, 452; 2022, c. 355.

Cross references.

As to conditions and requirements for licensure of persons under 18, see §

46.2-334

. As to requirements for a learner’s permit, see §

46.2-335

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

Acts 2009, c. 463, as amended by Acts 2010, c. 60, provides: “§ 1. That no statutes or regulations prescribing additional graduation requirements, pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, shall become effective before July 1, 2011, unless such statutes or regulations are also specifically required by federal code, federal regulation, or court action.”

Acts 2009, c. 463, as amended by Acts 2010, cc. 398 and 604, Acts 2011, cc. 391 and 411, and Acts 2012, c. 744, provides: “§ 1. That no statutes or regulations related to the implementation of an Academic and Career Plan prescribing additional requirements upon which the accreditation rating of schools in the Commonwealth is based, pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:3 of the Code of Virginia, beyond those already in effect on July 1, 2008, shall become effective before July 1, 2013, unless such statutes or regulations are also specifically required by federal code, federal regulation, or court action. Furthermore, that no statutes or regulations prescribing additional graduation requirements, pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, shall become effective before July 1, 2012, unless such statutes or regulations are also specifically required by federal code, federal regulation, or court action. Furthermore, the passing rates required for full accreditation in 2012-2013 based on assessments administered during the 2011-2012 school year shall be the same passing rates required for full accreditation during the 2008-2009 school year. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, schools with a graduating class shall meet prescribed thresholds on a graduation and completion rate index, as prescribed by the Board of Education, for accreditation ratings for 2011-2012. Furthermore, notwithstanding the provisions of this section, regulations prescribing economics and financial literacy as a graduation requirement and related changes to the standard and advanced studies diploma, pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, shall become effective July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2012, cc. 454 and 642, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall eliminate technical diplomas that have not been implemented and shall promulgate regulations to implement the other provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall adopt regulations and establish guidelines to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2015, cc. 564 and 565, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall establish criteria for awarding a diploma seal of biliteracy pursuant to this act in time for any student graduating from a public high school in the Commonwealth in 2016 to be awarded such a diploma seal.”

Acts 2015, c. 705, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2015, c. 705, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on the Board’s progress towards updating its formula for collecting, analyzing, and reporting high school graduation and dropout data pursuant to this act no later than December 1, 2015.”

Acts 2016, cc. 720 and 750, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than August 1, 2016, the Board of Education shall notify each local school board of its plan for the implementation of the provisions of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which plan shall include provisions by which the Board shall solicit comments from each local school board and from the public on its website for a period of at least 12 months.”

Acts 2016, c. 720, cl. 3 provides: “That no later than July 31, 2017, the Board of Education shall conduct at least one public hearing in each of the eight superintendent’s regions relating to its plan for the implementation of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts 2016, c. 720, cl. 4 provides: “That no later than September 1, 2017, the Board of Education shall submit (i) to the Registrar of Regulations proposed regulations to establish graduation requirements pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act and (ii) to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health a report on such proposed regulations.”

Acts 2016, c. 720, cl. 5 provides: “That after September 1, 2017, the Board of Education shall conduct at least one public hearing in each of the eight superintendent’s regions relating to its proposed regulations to establish graduation requirements pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts 2016, c. 720, cl. 6, and Acts 2016, c. 750 cl. 5, provides: “That no later than December 1, 2017, the Board of Education shall submit to the Registrar of Regulations final regulations to establish graduation requirements pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts 2016, c. 720, cl. 7, and Acts 2016, c. 750, cl. 6, provides: “That the graduation requirements established by the Board of Education pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall apply to each student who enrolls in high school as (i) a freshman after July 1, 2018; (ii) a sophomore after July 1, 2019; (iii) a junior after July 1, 2020; or (iv) a senior after July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2016, c. 750, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall, in accordance with Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, widely solicit and accept public comments relating to the implementation of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, through the acceptance of public comments on its website and through public hearings to be held throughout the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2016, c. 750, cl. 4 provides: “That the Board of Education shall submit a report on the status of the implementation of subdivisions D 1, 2, and 3 of § 22.1-253.13:4 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than December 1, 2016.”

Acts 2018, c. 139, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, c. 640, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall develop and submit to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than November 1, 2019, guidelines for local school boards to develop and implement a senior capstone project, portfolio, performance-based assessment, or structured experiment. In developing such guidelines, the Board of Education shall consult with stakeholders representing a variety of local school divisions, industries, and education organizations and shall consider (i) the diversity of school divisions across the Commonwealth, (ii) the need for local flexibility, and (iii) the needs of communities and industries across the Commonwealth.”’

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 4 was codified as the third paragraph in subsection B of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 1998 amendment

by cc. 602 and 627, effective July 1, 2003, are identical, and deleted former subsection A relating to “the General Assembly and the Board of Education recognizing the need to reduce the illiteracy rate in the Commonwealth”; deleted former subsection B relating to “each local school board awarding Literacy Passports to all students, including students with disabilities, who achieve passing scores on the literacy tests established by the Board of Education,” and deleted the second paragraph of subsection B, relating to “analysis and evaluation in order to meet the goals of this subsection”; redesignated former subsection C as present subsection A, and in the first sentence deleted “literacy” following “pass the prescribed”; and redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections B and C.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical education programs” for “vocational studies” in subsection D.

The 2001 amendment by c. 500 added the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment, by c. 688 added subsection E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 509 added the last paragraph in subsections A, B, and C.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted “of program completion” near the middle and substituted “are not eligible to receive a standard, advanced studies, modified standard, or general achievement diploma” for “do not qualify for diplomas”; inserted subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection E and added the language “In the exercise . . . providing for diploma seals” at the beginning of the first paragraph and added the next-to-last and last paragraphs; and redesignated former subsection E as present subsection F and deleted “By September
1, 2003” at the beginning. For effective date, see note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 345 added subdivision D 5 and made related changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 584, effective October 1, 2008, added subsection G.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 34 and 56 are identical, and rewrote the second paragraph and added the third paragraph in subdivision D 5 [now D 6].

The 2007 amendment by c. 234, in subsection A, substituted “to facilitate the transfer and appropriate grade placement of students from other public secondary schools, from nonpublic” for “for students who transfer between secondary schools, and from nonpublic” in the second sentence of the first paragraph, substituted “the parents of” for “the parent of” and “standards for accreditation” for “standards of accreditation” and inserted “and subject area requirements” twice in the third paragraph; substituted “requirements for a standard or advanced studies diploma of” for “requirements for graduation of” in the second paragraph of subsection B; in subsection C, inserted “special” in the first paragraph; substituted “one credit in fine or performing arts or career and technical education and” for “one credit in fine, performing or practical arts and” in subdivision D 2; and deleted “practical arts” following “technology-related” in clause (iii) of the second paragraph of subsection E.

The 2007 amendment by c. 351 inserted “that includes the types of activities that shall qualify as community service and the number of hours required” in clause (ii) in the third paragraph of subsection E.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 859 and 919 are identical, and added present subdivision D 3; and redesignated former subdivisions D 3 through D 5 as present subdivisions D 4 through D 6.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 351 inserted “or if he chooses, he shall receive an advanced studies diploma” in subdivision D 3.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 490, inserted the third sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 80 and 162 are identical, and inserted “shall be identified in the Academic and Career Plan as described in Board of Education regulations” in the last sentence of subdivision D 2.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 89 and 163 are nearly identical, and rewrote the second paragraph of subdivision D 6.

The 2010 amendment by c. 313 added subdivision D 7 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 209, in subsection E, inserted “standard technical” and “advanced technical” throughout and made related changes, and inserted “modified standard” in the third paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 454 and 642 are identical, and deleted “of this title” following “Article 2 (§ 22.1-213 et seq.) of Chapter 13” in the last paragraph of subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “Board of Education-approved diploma” for “standard, advanced studies, modified standard, special, or general achievement diploma” in the first paragraph and deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 1 (§ 22.1-1 et seq.)” in the last paragraph; in subsection D, rewrote subdivisions D 2 and D 3; in subsection E, substituted “Board of Education-approved diploma” for “standard, standard technical, advanced studies, or advanced technical diploma” in the first paragraph, substituted “Board of Education-approved diplomas” for “standard, standard technical, advanced studies, and advanced technical diplomas” in the next-to-last paragraph, and substituted “Board of Education-approved diplomas” for “modified standard, standard, standard technical, advanced studies, and advanced technical diplomas” in the last paragraph; and in subsection F, inserted “adult high school” and “are not subject to the compulsory school attendance requirements of § 22.1-254 and,” inserted clause (iii), redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv) and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 498 and 530 are identical, and added the third paragraph in subdivision D 2; in the third paragraph in subdivision D 6, deleted “a” following “this subdivision,” and substituted “means” for “is.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, subsection F, clause (i), substituted “a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “the GED examination.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 590 added subdivision D 8.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 329 in subsection B, inserted “and meet certain requirements prescribed by the Board pursuant to regulations but do not meet the requirements for any named diploma” and substituted “Applied Studies diplomas” for “special diplomas.”

The 2015 amendments by cc. 564 and 565 are identical, and in subsection E, deleted “academic” following “to recognize exemplary” in the first paragraph; added the subdivision designations and made related changes; inserted “In addition” in subdivision E 2; deleted “also” following “The Board shall”
in subdivision E 3; and added subdivision E 4.

The 2015 amendment by c. 591 substituted “except when a career and technical education credential in a particular subject area is not readily available or appropriate or does not adequately measure student competency, in which case the student shall receive satisfactory competency-based instruction in the subject area to satisfy the standard diploma requirements. The career and technical education credential, when required, could include” for “that could include, but not be limited to” in the second paragraph of subdivision D 2.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 701 and 702 are identical, and added subdivision D 9.

The 2015 amendment by c. 705, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “and make available to the public” in subsection G; added subsection H; inserted the subsection I designation and added “required by subsections G and H” at the end.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 720 and 750 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date of amendments to subsection D, see note.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 330, in subdivision D 6, inserted “the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery” in last sentence; in subdivision D 12, inserted “Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery assessments passed, and” in the second paragraph; and in subsection F, inserted “the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 685, in subdivision D 6, substituted “Require” for “Graduation requirements shall include a requirement” in the first sentence; added subdivision D 16.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 139, effective July 1, 2019, added the last two sentences in subdivision D 6.

The 2018 amendment by c. 482, in subdivision E 2, substituted “science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM)” for “advanced mathematics and technology” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “relevant coursework” for “technology courses” and “relevant training” for “technology-related training.”

The 2018 amendment by c. 512 added subdivision D 17.

The 2018 amendment by c. 592 added subdivision D 18.

The 2018 amendment by c. 716 added subdivision D 19.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 55 and 580 are identical, and in subdivision D 6, deleted “either” preceding “(i) complete an Advanced Placement,” in clause (i), deleted “or” preceding “International Baccalaureate,” and substituted “or dual enrollment course” for “course or,” inserted clause (ii), and redesignated former clause (ii) as clause (iii).

The 2020 amendments by c. 874 added subsection D 20.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection B, added the second sentence in the first paragraph and added the last paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsections A and F, in subdivision D 12 in the first two paragraphs, and in subdivision D 14, deleted “of Education” following “Board”; in subsection C in the first paragraph, in subdivisions E 2 through 4, and in subsection F, substituted “Board-approved” for “Board of Education-approved” throughout; deleted “of Education” following “Department” in subdivision D 6; deleted “Beginning with first-time ninth grade students in the 2016-2017 school year” in subdivision D 7 at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Attorney General declined to render opinion on matter delegated to Board of Education. —

The Attorney General declined to render an opinion on whether an enrolled, full-time public school student may transfer credits from courses completed outside the school system when the school system offers similar courses as the General Assembly had clearly delegated the decision-making authority on this matter to the Board of Education. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Emily Couric, Member, Senate of Virginia, 00-075, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 62 (10/30/00).